Utah statutes.
75-3-803.   Limitations on presentation of claims.
(1)  All claims against a decedent's estate which arose before the death of
the decedent, including claims of the state and any subdivision of it, whether
due or to become due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated,
founded on contract, tort, or other legal basis, if not barred earlier by
other statute of limitations, are barred against the estate, the personal
representative, and the heirs and devisees of the decedent, unless presented
within the earlier of the following dates:
(a)  one year after the decedent's death; or
(b)  within the time provided by Subsection 75-3-801(2) for creditors who are
given actual notice, and where notice is published, within the time provided
in Subsection 75-3-801(1) for all claims barred by publication.
(2)  In all events, claims barred by the nonclaim statute at the decedent's
domicile are also barred in this state.
(3)  All claims against a decedent's estate which arise at or after the death
of the decedent, including claims of the state and any of its subdivisions,
whether due or to become due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or
unliquidated, founded on contract, tort, or other legal basis are barred
against the estate, the personal representative, and the heirs and devisees of
the decedent, unless presented as follows:
(a)  a claim based on a contract with the personal representative within three
months after performance by the personal representative is due; or
(b)  any other claim within the later of three months after it arises, or the
time specified in Subsection (1)(a).
(4)  Nothing in this section affects or prevents:
(a)  any proceeding to enforce any mortgage, pledge, or other lien upon
property of the estate;
(b)  to the limits of the insurance protection only, any proceeding to
establish liability of the decedent or the personal representative for which
he is protected by liability insurance; or
(c)  collection of compensation for services rendered and reimbursement for
expenses advanced by the personal representative or by the attorney or
accountant for the personal representative of the estate.
